Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-513
Sale, lease, or transfer; promotion expenditures; statement.

Within ten days after any election upon the proposition of the sale, lease or transfer of any electric light or power plant, distribution system or transmission lines, as provided by section 70-504, the person, firm, association or corporation proposing to make or secure such purchase, lease or transfer, shall file with the Secretary of State a sworn statement, in form and detail to be approved by the Attorney General, showing all expenditures made and all obligations incurred by such proposed purchaser, directly or indirectly, in connection with or pertaining to such proposed sale, lease or transfer, and in connection with or pertaining to such election.

Initiative Law 1930, No. 324, § 8;

Laws 1931, c. 116, § 8, p. 341;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 70-608;

R.S.1943, § 70-513.